Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.440

Loan principal and interest fund.

In order to alleviate temporary cash flow deficiencies in the general fund, it has been and will continue to be necessary to borrow funds through issuance of certificates of indebtedness and to pay interest costs on outstanding certificates of indebtedness and to retire the principal thereof. In order to account for the interest cost of the loans and to pay the principal thereof, there is hereby created in the state treasury the loan principal and interest fund. All principal and interest payments required on certificates of indebtedness will be withdrawn from any general state revenues in the treasury and deposited in the loan principal and interest fund at the time or times required by the terms thereof and such loan principal and interest shall be paid from the loan principal and interest fund according to the terms and schedules established for such certificates.

[ 1983 c 189 s 8.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 189: See note following RCW 82.24.260.